Washington statutes.
RCW 36.94.040

Incorporation of provisions of comprehensive plan in general plan.

The sewerage and/or water general plan must incorporate the provisions of existing comprehensive plans relating to sewerage and water systems of cities, towns, municipalities, and private utilities, to the extent they have been implemented.

[ 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 33; 1967 c 72 s 4.]

NOTES:

Severability—Part, section headings not law—1990 1st ex.s. c 17: See RCW 36.70A.900 and 36.70A.901.